Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3401
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-3401 to 13-3408 shall be known and may be cited as the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act.

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 1.